Hawaii, session 2026, SB2955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Honoapiilani highway, also known as state route 30, serves as the only continuous motor vehicle access connecting West Maui to the rest of the island.  Thus, the highway's integrity is essential for the movement of residents, visitors, goods, emergency services, and essential supplies in and out of the region.  It is especially critical to the rebuilding of Lahaina that this corridor is protected from interruption. The legislature further finds that the existing alignment of Honoapiilani highway, between Papalaua beach park in Ukumehame and Launiupoko, lies at or near mean sea level and is chronically vulnerable to coastal hazards, including accelerated coastal erosion, seasonal high-wave flooding, storm surge, and projected sea level rise.  These hazards have repeatedly caused roadway damage and temporary closures, necessitating emergency repairs, and conditions are expected to worsen as the effects of climate change intensify. The legislature recognizes that previous short-term protective measures, including seawalls and revetments, have proven inadequate or controversial due to environmental, cultural, and sustainability concerns.  Therefore, inland relocation of the vulnerable coastal highway alignment remains the only feasible means of providing reliable, resilient access for the foregoing purposes. The legislature also finds that multiple formal assessments by the department of transportation and federal partners, including a completed final environmental impact statement, have repeatedly documented the purpose of and need for the proposed relocation project.  The assessments have led to the highway segments at Olowalu and Ukumehame being ranked among the highest-priority coastal erosion and vulnerability sites in the State.  These segments have been subject to multiple emergency interventions that do not provide long-term resilience. The legislature acknowledges that while the relocation of the Honoapiilani highway is critical to the safety, health, and economic well-being of Maui residents, federal support for infrastructure resilience projects remains uncertain and competitive.  Consequently, it is a matter of statewide priority to ensure that all moneys appropriated, allocated, or received--whether from federal, state, or private entities--are applied exclusively to the planning, design, permitting, acquisition, and construction of the inland highway relocation in the essential Ukumehame-Launiupoko corridor, and not diverted to ancillary projects that do not directly contribute to the State's primary transportation duties and objectives. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Appropriate state and federal funds for this critical relocation project; and (2)  Establish the legislature's intent that these funds be used exclusively for the relocation of the Honoapiilani highway, and not for ancillary traffic devices that may diminish the green time for the main line. SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $76,700,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of financing capital improvements for the Honoapiilani highway coastal mitigation project; provided that $306,800,000 in federal funding is received for the same; provided further that no sum shall be expended for any purpose other than the relocation of the highway pursuant to the coastal mitigation project. SECTION 3. The sum appropriated for the capital improvement project set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________